Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1621
Low hazard potential, defined.

Low hazard potential means a hazard potential classification such that failure or misoperation of the dam would result in no probable loss of human life and in low economic loss.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 21.